Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202575-364
Additional federal motor carrier regulations; provisions adopted.

The parts, subparts, and sections of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations listed below, or any other parts, subparts, and sections referred to by such parts, subparts, and sections, in existence and effective as of the date specified in section 75-365, are adopted as part of Nebraska law and shall be applicable to all motor carriers whether engaged in interstate or intrastate commerce, drivers of such motor carriers, and vehicles of such motor carriers:

(1) Part 107 - HAZARDOUS MATERIALS PROGRAM PROCEDURES, subpart F - Registration of Cargo Tank and Cargo Tank Motor Vehicle Manufacturers, Assemblers, Repairers, Inspectors, Testers, and Design Certifying Engineers;

(2) Part 107 - HAZARDOUS MATERIALS PROGRAM PROCEDURES, subpart G - Registration of Persons Who Offer or Transport Hazardous Materials;

(3) Part 171 - GENERAL INFORMATION, REGULATIONS, AND DEFINITIONS;

(4) Part 172 - HAZARDOUS MATERIALS TABLE, SPECIAL PROVISIONS, HAZARDOUS MATERIALS COMMUNICATIONS, EMERGENCY RESPONSE INFORMATION, TRAINING REQUIREMENTS, AND SECURITY PLANS;

(5) Part 173 - SHIPPERS - GENERAL REQUIREMENTS FOR SHIPMENTS AND PACKAGINGS;

(6) Part 177 - CARRIAGE BY PUBLIC HIGHWAY;

(7) Part 178 - SPECIFICATIONS FOR PACKAGINGS; and

(8) Part 180 - CONTINUING QUALIFICATION AND MAINTENANCE OF PACKAGINGS.

Laws 1986, LB 301, § 2;

Laws 1987, LB 538, § 1;

Laws 1988, LB 884, § 2;

Laws 1990, LB 980, § 30;

Laws 1991, LB 854, § 4;

Laws 1993, LB 410, § 2;

Laws 1994, LB 1061, § 6;

Laws 1995, LB 461, § 2;

Laws 1996, LB 938, § 5;

Laws 1997, LB 722, § 2;

Laws 1998, LB 1056, § 9;

Laws 1999, LB 161, § 2;

Laws 2000, LB 1361, § 12;

Laws 2001, LB 375, § 2;

Laws 2002, LB 499, § 6;

Laws 2003, LB 480, § 3;

Laws 2004, LB 878, § 2;

Laws 2005, LB 83, § 2;

Laws 2006, LB 1007, § 15;

Laws 2007, LB239, § 9;

Laws 2008, LB756, § 29;

Laws 2009, LB48, § 2;

Laws 2009, LB331, § 16;

Laws 2010, LB805, § 14;

Laws 2011, LB178, § 22;

Laws 2011, LB212, § 8;

Laws 2012, LB751, § 50;

Laws 2013, LB35, § 7;

Laws 2014, LB983, § 62;

Laws 2015, LB313, § 8;

Laws 2016, LB929, § 12;

Laws 2017, LB263, § 89;

Laws 2018, LB909, § 122;

Laws 2019, LB79, § 23;

Laws 2020, LB944, § 79;

Laws 2021, LB149, § 22;

Laws 2022, LB750, § 80;

Laws 2023, LB138, § 52;

Laws 2024, LB1200, § 61;

Laws 2025, LB398, § 58.